Hawaii, session 2025, SB329.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Chapter 342D, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§342D-     Recycled water; requirement.  By January 1, 2045, no less than fifty per cent of treatment works effluent shall be recycled water classified as R-1 and that is suitable for use in recycled water systems." SECTION 2.  Section 342D-50.5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending subsection (a) to read as follows: "(a) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, no person, including any public body, shall discharge any treated or raw sewage into state waters after December 31, [2026;] 2030; provided that this section shall not apply to a sewage treatment plant that: (1)  Utilizes sewage to produce clean energy pursuant to section 196-10.5[;] and has primary and secondary outfalls; provided that the primary outfall shall not be located in state waters; and (2)  Is in compliance with this chapter, rules adopted pursuant to this chapter, or a permit or variance issued by the director." SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________